Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1813.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-202, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-202. Arizona state hospital; purpose; facilities and equipment A. A state hospital shall be maintained for the to care for and treatment of treat persons with mental disorders and persons with other personality disorders or emotional conditions who will benefit from care and treatment. Admissions to the state hospital shall be in accordance with law.  The state hospital shall admit patients based on clinical need for treatment and shall not place any limit on admission based on a patient's county of residence.  The hospital shall be called the Arizona state hospital. B. Subject to legislative appropriation, the state hospital may provide services to persons who are suffering from alcoholism and to persons suffering from drug abuse. C. The state hospital shall have adequate facilities and equipment for enlightened and scientific treatment of nervous and mental diseases in accordance with approved methods of mental therapeutics. The facilities shall include, among other things: 1. Facilities for medical and psychiatric treatment with special attention to occupational therapy and other special therapies. 2. Facilities for proper segregation and care of child patients. 3. Facilities for recreation and physical training. 4. An institutional library for the use of patients. 5. A properly equipped dental department. 6. A properly equipped laboratory and x-ray department. 7. A patient tracking system approved by the director that monitors individual progress on an inpatient basis and ensures suitable aftercare placement. D. The state hospital shall be under the charge and control of the director of the department of health services, pursuant to this article.END_STATUTE